Utah statutes.
26-6-8.   Tuberculosis -- Duty of department to investigate, control, and
monitor.
(1) The department shall conduct or oversee the investigation, control, and
monitoring of suspected or confirmed tuberculosis infection and disease within
the state.  Local health departments shall investigate, control, and monitor
suspected or confirmed tuberculosis infection and disease within their
respective jurisdictions.
(2)  A health care provider who treats an individual with suspected or
confirmed tuberculosis shall treat the individual according to guidelines
established by the department.
